test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_22oi_kulkkiija_oahpa-gt-norm-dial_Var.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kulkija - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'borg' - ei tsekattu
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Nom: kulkija # kaksi vai yksi k?
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Gen: kulkijan
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Par: kulkijaa
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Tra: kulkijaksi
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Abe: kulkijatta
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Ine: kulkijassa
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Ela: kulkijasta
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Ill: kulkijhaan
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Ade: kulkijalla
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Abl: kulkijalta
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+All: kulkijalle
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Ess: kulkijanna
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Nom: kulkijat
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Gen: kulkijoitten
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Par: kulkijoita
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Tra: kulkijoiksi
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Abe: kulkijoitta
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Ine: kulkijoissa
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Ela: kulkijoista
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Ill: kulkijhoin
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Ade: kulkijoila
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Abl: kulkijoilta
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+All: kulkijoile
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Ess: kulkijoina
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Com: kulkijoine
